Hawaii statutes.
§291E-5 Ignition interlock user
affordability. The director of transportation shall contract with the
selected ignition interlock vendor to provide partial financial relief for the
installation and the periodic calibration charges to offenders who apply for
such assistance and who are recipients, at the time of license revocation or
suspension, of either food stamps under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, or free services under the Older Americans Act or Developmentally
Disabled Assistance and Bill of Rights Act. [L 2008, c 171, pt of §2; am L
2009, c 88, §§2, 13, 17(2); am L 2010, c 166, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next